Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1816
Parking motor vehicles on right-of-way; county board; power to prohibit or restrict; violation; penalty.

In order to promote safety, power is conferred upon the county board of any county to prohibit or restrict the parking of motor vehicles on the right-of-way of county highways outside the corporate limits of any city or village and to erect and maintain appropriate signs thereon giving notice of no parking or restricted parking.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which parks a motor vehicle in the right-of-way of a county highway where no parking or restricted parking signs have been erected or maintained, in violation of such signs, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Whenever any peace officer finds a vehicle parked in violation of this section, he or she may move such vehicle at the expense of the registered owner or request the driver or person in charge of such vehicle to move such vehicle.

If any motor vehicle is found upon the right-of-way of any county highway in violation of this section and the identity of the driver cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose name such vehicle is registered shall be prima facie responsible for such violation.

Laws 1963, c. 216, § 1, p. 688;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 219;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 213.